Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.540

Training of administrators.

A person having responsibility for the administration or conduct of elections shall, within eighteen months of undertaking those responsibilities, receive general training regarding the conduct of elections and specific training regarding their responsibilities and duties as prescribed by this title or by rules adopted by the secretary of state under this title. Included among those persons for whom such training is mandatory are the following:

(1) Secretary of state elections division personnel;

(2) County elections administrators under RCW 36.22.220; and

(3) Any other person or group charged with election administration responsibilities if the person or group is designated by rule adopted by the secretary of state as requiring the training.

Neither this section nor RCW 29A.04.530 may be construed as requiring an elected official to receive training or a certificate of training as a condition for seeking or holding elective office or as a condition for carrying out constitutional duties.

[ 2011 c 10 s 11; 2009 c 415 s 9; 2003 c 111 s 152; 1992 c 163 s 6. Formerly RCW 29.60.040.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Effective date—1992 c 163 ss 5-13: See note following RCW 29A.04.530.